Washington statutes.
RCW 34.08.030

Preparation and transmittal of material by agencies to code reviser—Rules regarding.

All material included in the register pursuant to RCW 34.08.020 shall be prepared by the appropriate agency or official and transmitted to the code reviser in accordance with rules adopted by the code reviser prescribing the style, format, and numbering system therefor, the date of receipt for inclusion within a particular register, and such other requirements as may be necessary for the orderly and efficient publication of the register and the Washington Administrative Code.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 240 s 4.]